South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4970.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 40, Title 27 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 27-40-350. A tenant who is convicted of a crime unrelated to the possession, sale, or use of illicit substances or firearms must be given three months to relocate after the conviction. If the tenant cannot relocate his personal property within the three-month period, the landlord shall store the personal property for thirty days. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----